California statutes. Education Code
Whenever prior to the receipt by a community college district of its state, county, city and county, or district funds, any district does not have sufficient money to its credit to meet current expenses of maintenance, the board of supervisors of the county or city and county shall order, and the auditor and treasurer of the county or city and county shall make a temporary transfer from any funds of the county or city and county not immediately needed to pay claims against them to the school fund of the district of the amount needed, not exceeding 85 percent of the amount of money which will accrue to the community college district during the fiscal year. Upon the making of the transfer the auditor shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools of the county, or city and county, of the amount transferred. Each transfer of funds requested under this section shall be granted in order of receipt by the board of supervisors, regardless of whether sufficient county funds are available for transfer to meet pending or anticipated requests of community college districts.

The funds transferred under this section to the credit of a community college district shall be retransferred by the auditor and treasurer to the funds from which they were taken from the first moneys accruing to the district or county school service fund and before any other obligation of the district is paid from the money accruing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85221.

The county superintendent of schools of each county with the approval of the county board of education, may make temporary transfers to a community college district which does not have sufficient money to its credit to meet current operating expenses from the county school service fund, in such amounts and at such times as he deems necessary. Such transfers shall not exceed 85 percent of the amount of money accruing to the district at the time of transfer. The amounts so transferred shall be repaid to the county school service fund prior to June 30 of the current year from any funds subsequently received by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85222.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, may make an apportionment to a community college district from the county school service fund conditional upon the repayment to the fund during the next succeeding fiscal year of the amount apportioned to the district and shall, during the next succeeding fiscal year, transfer the amount of such apportionment from the general fund of the district to the county school service fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85223.

Upon the request of the board of governors, the auditor and treasurer of a county or city and county shall make a temporary transfer from any funds of the county or city and county not immediately needed to pay claims against them to the general fund of the newly organized community college district for the purpose of meeting the current expense of the district until the district receives its first state apportionments or district tax funds. Upon making the transfer, the auditor shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools of the county or the city and county of the amount transferred.

The funds transferred under this section to the general fund of a newly organized district shall be retransferred by the auditor and the treasurer to the fund from which they were taken from the first moneys accruing to the district after it becomes effective for all purposes and before any other obligation of the district is paid from the money accruing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Requisitions and Warrants [85230. - 85244.]

85230.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this code, money shall be paid from the funds of any community college district for the payment of the expenses of the district, only as provided in this article.

(b) The Legislature reaffirms the status of the California Community Colleges as a segment of public higher education and the role of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in providing general supervision over community college districts. The Legislature also reaffirms its grant of substantial fiscal autonomy to community college districts. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for certain relationships between county offices and community college districts while confirming that governance authority over the community college districts rests with district governing boards and the board of governors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

85231.

All payments from the funds of a community college district shall be made by written order of the governing board of the district. Orders shall be on forms prescribed by the county superintendent of schools. Forms may be printed and furnished by the board of supervisors or the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

85232.

Each order drawn on the funds of a community college district shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the governing board of the district, or by a person or persons authorized by the governing board to sign orders in its name. No person other than an officer or employee of the district shall be authorized to sign orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85233.

The governing board of each community college district shall be responsible for filing, or causing to be filed, with the county superintendent of schools the verified signature of each person, including members of the governing board, authorized to sign orders in its name. Except for districts determined to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 85266 and districts determined to be fiscally independent pursuant to Section 85266.5, no order on the funds of any district shall be approved by the county superintendent of schools unless the signatures are on file in the superintendent’s office and he or she is satisfied that the signatures on the order are those of persons authorized to sign the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 131.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

85234.

Each order drawn against the funds of a community college district shall be numbered and shall state: (a) the particular fund or funds of the district against which it is drawn, (b) the amount of the payment to be made from each fund, and (c) the rate of salary and the period of service of any employee of the district for whom an order is issued for payment of salary or wages. If drawn for any purpose other than the payment of salaries or wages of district employees, the order shall be accompanied by an itemized bill showing the separate items and the price of each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85235.

Each order drawn against the funds of a community college district shall be transmitted to the county superintendent of schools, and, if approved and signed by him or her, shall become a requisition on the county auditor. The county superintendent may prescribe alternative procedures for districts determined to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 85266.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 23.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85236.

The county superintendent of schools may examine each order on community college district funds transmitted to him or her, in the order in which it is received in his or her office. If it appears that the order is properly drawn for the payment of legally authorized expenses against the proper funds of the district, and that there are sufficient moneys in the fund or funds against which the order is drawn to pay it, he or she shall endorse upon it “examined and approved,” and shall, in attestation thereof, affix his or her signature and number and date the requisition and transmit it directly to the county auditor, in the order in which the order is received in his or her office. The county superintendent may prescribe alternative methods for districts determined to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 85266.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 24.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85237.

(a) If, at any time during a fiscal year, the county superintendent of schools concludes that the expenditures of a community college district in the territory within his or her jurisdiction are likely to exceed the anticipated income of the district for that fiscal year, he or she shall notify the district in writing of that conclusion, and may conduct a comprehensive review of the financial and budgetary conditions of the district.

(b) The superintendent shall report his or her findings and recommendations under this section to the governing board of the district, and may include recommendations of methods by which the budgeted expenditures for the balance of the fiscal year may be brought into balance with the revenue of the district. The report shall be made to the governing board at a public meeting of the governing board. The governing board shall, no later than 15 days after receipt of the report, notify the county superintendent of schools of its proposed actions on those recommendations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 25.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85237.5.

(a) At any time during a fiscal year, the county superintendent may audit the expenditures and internal controls of community college districts he or she determines to be fiscally accountable. The county superintendent shall report his or her findings and recommendation to the governing board of the district.

(b) The governing board shall, no later than 15 days after receipt of the report made under this section, notify the county superintendent of schools of its proposed actions on his or her recommendation. Upon review of the governing board report, the county superintendent, at his or her discretion, may revoke the authority for the district to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 85266.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 26.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85238.

If the order is disapproved by the county superintendent of schools, it shall be returned to the governing board of the community college district, except as otherwise provided in this code for the registration of warrants, with a statement of his or her reasons for disapproving the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 27.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85239.

(a) The county auditor may examine each order and requisition on community college district funds transmitted by the county superintendent of schools. If the county auditor allows the order and requisition, he or she shall endorse thereon “examined and allowed,” and shall date, number, and sign it, whereupon it shall become a warrant on the county treasurer. The county auditor shall detach any bill attached to the requisition, and shall number the bill, giving it the same number given to the warrant, and file it in his or her office. The county auditor shall thereupon return the order, requisition, and warrant to the county superintendent of schools, who shall transmit it to the governing board of the district for issuance to the payee or to the order of the payee.

(b) (1) Any requisition of the county superintendent of schools, whether based upon written order of the governing board of a community college district or authorized by law, shall constitute full authority for the signature for allowance thereof by the county auditor as a warrant on the county treasurer, and no other authority shall be necessary or required for that action by the county auditor.

(2) “Requisition,” as used in this section, includes any order or demand signed by the county superintendent of schools directing the county auditor to draw his or her warrant on the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 28.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85239.1.

The county auditor may authorize the destruction of any bill or supporting document received from a school district for purposes of Section 85239 if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The record, paper, or document is photographed, microphotographed, or reproduced on film of a type approved for permanent photographic records by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(b) The device used to reproduce such record, paper, or document on film is one which accurately reproduces the original thereof in all details.

(c) The photographs, microphotographs, or other reproductions on film are placed in conveniently accessible files and provision is made for preserving, examining, and using the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 74.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

85240.

(a) In lieu of drawing a warrant as provided in Section 85239, the county auditor may, with the approval of the governing board of the community college district, endorse, date, and number the order and requisition, and may prepare a separate warrant on the county treasurer for the same amount as the order and requisition. The warrant shall show that it had been drawn on the order of a community college district, shall name the community college district, and shall show the payee and date of issue, as well as other information deemed appropriate by the county auditor.

(b) The county auditor shall draw the separate warrant by signing it, and no other signature shall be required. Thereupon, the county auditor shall transmit the separate warrant to the county superintendent of schools, who shall transmit it to the governing board of the district for issuance to the payee or to the order of the payee, or, with the approval of the governing board of the district, shall transmit it to the payee.

(c) The order and requisition may direct the transfer of the amount of the separate warrant from the funds of the district to a clearing fund in the county treasury, which shall be known as the Schools Commercial Revolving Fund, to the end that separate warrants for all districts may be drawn against a single revolving fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 29.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85241.

The governing board of any community college district may, with the approval of the county auditor and county treasurer, in lieu of issuing single orders for the payment of the salary or wages of each employee, issue payroll orders, on forms prescribed by the county superintendent of schools for the payment of the salaries or wages of two or more employees. Payroll orders may be drawn only for the payment of salaries and wages of employees, and shall constitute requisitions on the county auditor and warrants on the county treasurer when approved and signed by the county superintendent of schools and allowed and signed by the county auditor, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

85242.

Each payroll order drawn pursuant to this article shall be drawn, approved, and issued in the same manner and shall contain the same minimum content as prescribed for single orders. Each payroll order shall list the names of all employees in whose favor the order is drawn and shall state the amount of money due each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85243.

(a) The county superintendent of schools shall keep, open to the inspection of the public, a register of warrants, showing the fund upon which the requisitions have been drawn, the number, in whose favor, and for what purpose they were drawn.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall prescribe rules for community college districts determined to be fiscally accountable, pursuant to Section 85266, that retain copies of warrants and supporting documents within the district files.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 30.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85244.

(a) Orders for the payment of wages and payroll orders for the payment of wages of employees employed full time in positions that are not academic positions shall be drawn twice during each calendar month on days designated in advance by the governing board of each community college district to which this section is made applicable. Labor performed between the 1st and 15th days, inclusive, of any calendar month shall be paid for between the 16th and 26th day of the month during which the labor was performed, and labor performed between the 16th and the last day, inclusive, of any calendar month, shall be paid for between the 1st and 10th day of the following month.

(b) The governing board of each community college district that has 5,000 or more full-time equivalent students (FTES), and the governing board of each district with less than 5,000 FTES in a county with a population in excess of 4,000,000 persons as determined by the 1960 federal census, shall make this section applicable to the board, whenever a majority of the employees of the district employed full time in positions that are not academic positions petition the board in writing to do so.

(c) The governing board of a community college district that has less than 5,000 FTES, other than a community college district situated in a county with a population in excess of 4,000,000 persons as determined by the 1960 federal census, may, on the petition in writing of a majority of the employees of the district employed full time in positions that are not academic positions, make this section applicable to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 31.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Warrants [85260. - 85267.]

85260.

In any county, the county superintendent of schools, the county board of education and the county auditor, may prescribe a payroll procedure, to be followed by designated community college districts in the county, under which the community college district governing boards, by use of payroll orders, shall authorize and direct the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor to draw separate payroll warrants in the names of the individual district employees for the respective amounts set forth therein to the end that each employee may be furnished with a statement of the amount earned and an itemization of the amounts withheld therefrom under requirements of the law or by direction of the employee.

Such payroll warrants shall show the closing date of the pay period for which issued and the date of issue and a statement that it is drawn by order of the governing board of the district and shall bear the signature of the county auditor.

To obtain the advantage of a uniform pay period and pay date within districts, the payroll procedure may specify the ending date of the pay period and, notwithstanding Sections 87821 and 85244, the date of issue for payroll warrants, except that the issue date shall be on or before the 10th calendar day following the end of the pay period. The payroll procedure may provide for salary payments, including salary advances, more frequently than once a month.

The payroll procedure may provide for payroll orders authorizing salary payments to individual employees on a continuing basis until such time as notifications of changes or adjustments are submitted by the community college districts, provided that an itemized listing of payments made under this procedure is furnished to the community college district on or before the date of issue of the payroll warrants.

The payroll order may direct the transfer from the districts’ funds to a clearing fund in the county treasury, to be known as the schools payroll revolving fund, of the total of the amount of the payroll warrants to be issued under the order to the end that payroll warrants for all districts may be drawn against a single revolving fund. The payroll order may further direct the transfer from the districts’ funds of the totals of the various deductions set forth therein to the trust funds in the county treasury entitled to receive credit for them and may further direct the proper disbursement of such trust amounts.

When the payroll procedure provides for payment of salary once each month the payment shall be made on the last working day of the month as required by Section 88165.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 33.   Effective June 11, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

85260.5.

A payroll clearance fund for the purpose of consolidating and balancing payroll deductions and other payroll accounting purposes for one or more community college district employees whose salary is paid from one or more funds, may be established by the governing board of the community college district or, if the district operates under the payroll procedure set forth in Section 85260, by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 586, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

85265.5.

(a) In a county in which the board of supervisors has transferred educational functions to the county board of education pursuant to Section 1080, and a single budget has been authorized for the purposes of the county school service fund, county board of education, county committee on school district organization, and the office of the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Sections 1620 to 1625, inclusive, the duties of the county auditor specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 85230) and this article shall be performed by the county superintendent of schools.

(b) A listing of all warrants approved and allowed by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the county auditor on the same day the warrants are forwarded to the district or the payee. The form of the warrant and the form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the county auditor.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 27005 of the Government Code, or any other section requiring orders for warrants or warrants to be signed by the county auditor, the county treasurer in counties subject to this section shall pay warrants that are signed by the county superintendent of schools, and the county auditor shall not be liable under his or her bond or otherwise for any warrant issued pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall apply only in those counties in which the county board of supervisors has adopted its provisions by resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 32.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85266.

With the approval of the county superintendent of schools, the governing board of a community college district may cause warrants to be drawn on the county treasury against designated funds, except debt service, of the district in the county treasury in the payment of expenses of the district. The warrants for salary and other types of claims designated by the county superintendent shall be issued by a person designated as the district disbursing officer for the school district on the county treasury in favor of the persons entitled thereto in payment of all claims in designated categories chargeable against the district which have been legally examined, allowed, and ordered paid by the governing board. The district disbursing officer shall issue warrants, using procedures prescribed by the county auditor, on the county treasury for all debts and demands, within categories designated by the county superintendent, against the district when amounts are legally approved. The form of the warrant shall be prescribed by, and approved by, the county auditor or county treasurer having jurisdiction.

The cost of printing warrants may be charged to the district. Notwithstanding Section 84000, except for assessing and tax collecting, the county auditor and county treasurer may charge those districts that draw their own warrants for additional costs which result from the implementation of this section.

Notwithstanding Section 27005 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law requiring orders for warrants or warrants to be signed by the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor, or both, the county superintendent and county auditor may prescribe alternative procedures for districts to issue warrants. The district disbursing officer shall not be considered a deputy county superintendent of schools or a deputy county auditor. The county treasurer shall pay the warrant in the designated category, if district funds are available. 

County officers shall not be responsible for providing reports, statements, or other data relating to, or based on, the designated payments of expenses of the district. Those districts issuing warrants, as provided by this section, shall provide the county superintendent of schools, in the form prescribed by the county superintendent, with the data necessary to make retirement reports and other reports required of him or her by law. All warrants, vouchers, and supporting documents shall be kept by school districts that draw their own warrants in those designated categories.

The county superintendent shall provide for a periodic review of the districts’ financial transactions and internal controls pursuant to Section 85237.5.

County superintendents of schools may provide fiscal, budgetary, and data-processing services through contractual agreements to community college districts that have been determined to be fiscally accountable under the provisions of this section.

The person authorized by the governing board of the district to issue warrants, pursuant to this section, shall execute an official bond in an amount fixed by the governing board conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties under this section. A county superintendent or county auditor shall not be liable under the terms of their bonds or otherwise for any warrant issued pursuant to this section. This section shall not be construed as impairing the obligation of any contract in the bond of such officer in effect on January 1, 1977. 

A listing of the warrants issued under this section by each community college district shall be forwarded to the county auditor having jurisdiction, upon his or her request, and to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district on the same day warrants are issued. The listing, which may be magnetic tape, punched cards, or in other form, shall report, among other things, the warrant number, date of the warrant, amount of the warrant, the name of the payee, and the fund on which drawn. The form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the county auditor or county superintendent and approved by the county auditor or county superintendent having jurisdiction.

Each district which issues warrants pursuant to this section shall furnish monthly to the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor of the county of jurisdiction, upon his or her request, a statement showing for the current fiscal year to date, for each required expenditure classification, the amount budgeted, actual expenditures, encumbrances and unencumbered balances.

In order to obtain the approval of the county superintendent of schools and county auditor for fiscally accountable status, the governing board of a community college district shall file a written application with the county superintendent of schools and county auditor having jurisdiction on forms which the county superintendent shall prescribe. Upon receipt of an application from the district, the county superintendent shall cause an audit to be made of the district’s management and accounting controls, in accordance with standards prescribed by him or her, by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant approved by the county superintendent, who shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the county superintendent and to the applicant district. The audit report may include Department of Finance guidelines and other assessments of fiscal management as required by the county superintendent or the audit may be the report of the annual district audit pursuant to Section 84040 if that is acceptable to the county superintendent of schools. The cost of the audit required in support of a district’s application for fiscal accountability shall be borne by the applicant district.

The county superintendent and county auditor shall review the district’s application and report of financial management and control and may approve the application if they find the management and accounting controls of the district to be adequate. If the county superintendent and county auditor determine that such management and accounting controls are inadequate, they shall disapprove the application.

A district that applies for fiscal accountability status shall file its written application with the county superintendent of schools on or before September 1. The required audit of financial management and accounting controls shall be filed on or before January 1. When a district’s application for fiscal accountability status has been approved by the county superintendent of schools and county auditor, the issuance of warrants by the district pursuant to this section shall be effective at the beginning of a fiscal year, provided that approval had been made prior to the preceding first day in March. If disapproved, the county superintendent of schools shall state the specific steps which are required to be taken by the applicant district to receive approval and these changes shall be certified as completed by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant before the county superintendent shall approve the application. If at any time the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor determines that the financial management or accounting controls of the district have become inadequate, either officer may revoke approval for fiscal accountability status effective immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 314.)
-------------------------------------------

85266.5.

(a) With the approval of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the governing board of a community college district may cause to be drawn all warrants on the county treasurer against all the funds, except debt service, of the district in the county treasury in the payment of the expenses of the district. The warrants shall be issued by a person designated as the district auditor or district disbursing officer for the district on the county treasurer in favor of the persons entitled thereto in payment of all claims chargeable against the districts which have been legally examined, allowed, and ordered paid by the governing board. The district auditor shall issue warrants on the county treasurer for all debts and demands against the district when the amounts are fixed by law. The form of the warrant shall be as prescribed by the governing board and approved by the county auditor or county treasurer.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 85231, the cost of printing the warrants shall be borne by the district.

(c) No county officer shall be responsible for producing reports, statements, and other data relating to or based on these payments of the expenses of the districts. Those districts issuing warrants as provided by this section shall provide the county superintendent of schools, in the form prescribed by him or her, with the data necessary to make retirement reports and other reports required of him or her by law. All warrants, vouchers, and supporting documents shall be kept by the districts that draw their own warrants.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 27005 of the Government Code, or any other section requiring orders for warrants or warrants to be signed by the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor, or both, the county treasurer shall pay the warrant, if money is available.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 84000, except for assessing and tax collecting, the county auditor and the county treasurer may charge those districts that draw their own warrants, and those districts shall pay, for the cost of all fiscal services.

(f) The person authorized by the governing board of the district to issue warrants pursuant to this section shall execute an official bond in an amount fixed by the governing board conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties under this section. A county superintendent of schools or a county auditor shall not be liable under the terms of his or her bond or otherwise for any warrant issued pursuant to this section. It is not intended that this provision shall be applied so as to impair the obligation of any contract in the bond of the officer in effect on the effective date of this section.

(g) A listing of the warrants issued under this section by each district shall be forwarded to the county auditor, upon his or her request, and to the county superintendent of schools on the same day warrants are issued. The listing, which may be magnetic tape, punch cards, or in other form, shall report, among other things, the warrant number, date of the warrant, amount of the warrant, the name of the payee, and the fund on which drawn.

(h) The form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the governing board and approved by the county auditor.

(i) Each district which issues warrants pursuant to this section shall furnish monthly to the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor of the county of jurisdiction, upon his or her request, a statement showing the current fiscal year to date, for each required expenditure classification, the amount budgeted, actual expenditures, encumbrances and unencumbered balances.

(j) In order to obtain the approval of the board of governors, a community college district shall file a written application with the county superintendent of schools. Upon receipt of an application from the district, the county superintendent of schools shall cause a survey to be made of the district’s accounting controls by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant in accordance with standards prescribed by the board of governors. The certified public accountant or public accountant shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the county superintendent, county auditor, and to the applicant district.

(k) The county superintendent shall forward the district’s application, together with his or her other recommendations and the recommendations of the county auditor and a report of the survey, to the board of governors for approval or disapproval of the application. The board of governors shall approve the application only if it finds that the accounting controls of the district are adequate. If the board of governors determines that these controls are inadequate, it shall disapprove the application.

(l) The county superintendent of schools shall be reimbursed for all costs incident to the accounting controls survey made pursuant to the district’s application, from the district’s funds.

(m) When approved by the board of governors, the issuance of warrants pursuant to this section shall be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year if the approval had been made prior to the preceding first day in January. In the event that the issuance of warrant has been disapproved, the board of governors shall state the specific steps which must be taken by the district in order to receive approval. If at any time the county superintendent of schools determines that the accounting controls of the district have become inadequate, he or she may recommend to the board of governors that the approval be revoked, to be effective on the first day of the next following fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

85267.

Article 3 (commencing with Section 29850) of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code shall be applicable to any community college district authorized to issue warrants pursuant to Section 85266 or 85266.5; except that whenever any reference is made in that Article 3 (commencing with Section 29850) to (1) the county auditor, or (2) the general fund of the county, that reference shall be deemed, for purposes of this section, to be to (1) the person authorized by the community college district governing board to issue warrants pursuant to Section 85266 or 85266.5, and (2) the general fund of the community college district, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Void Warrants [85270. - 85272.]

85270.

Unless otherwise provided by county ordinance, any school warrant not presented to the county treasurer within six months after it was issued is void and any order issued by the governing board of a community college district, but not approved by the county superintendent of schools for want of funds, is void if not presented to the county superintendent of schools within two years after notice has been given that the order will be approved on presentation. The county auditor shall each month inform the county superintendent of schools of warrants which have become void during the preceding month and the county superintendent of schools shall transmit such information to the governing board of the district together with information as to orders which have become void.

Any time within two years from the date on which the original warrant became void, the payee, assignee, or the legal representative or heir of a deceased payee of any warrant which is void as provided in this section may present such warrant to the governing board of the community college district which issued the order on which the warrant was drawn, or declare by affidavit that such warrant has been lost or destroyed, and the governing board may adopt an order instructing the county auditor to draw a new warrant in favor of the payee in the same amount as the original warrant, or the governing board may by resolution authorize the county auditor to draw new warrants within the limitations prescribed by the resolution without prior individual order of the governing board, provided the limitations prescribed by this section have been complied with. Any such new warrant shall be subject to the same limitations as the original warrant which it replaces.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85271.
